Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2114XS (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 186 Section 1. Section 279.8, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The board shall make rules for its own government and 3 that of the directors, officers, employees, teachers and 4 pupils, and for the care of the schoolhouse, grounds, and 5 property of the school corporation, and shall aid in the 6 enforcement of the rules, and require the performance of duties 7 imposed by law and the rules. The board shall annually elect 8 an executive officer of the board, and the superintendent shall 9 not serve as the executive officer of the board. The board 10 shall include in its rules provisions regulating the loading 11 and unloading of pupils from a school bus stopped on the 12 highway during a period of reduced highway visibility caused 13 by fog, snow or other weather conditions. The board shall 14 have the authority to include in its rules provisions allowing 15 school corporation employees to use school credit cards to 16 pay for the actual and necessary expenses incurred in the 17 performance of work-related duties. 18 Sec. 2. Section 279.20, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 1. The board of directors of a school district may employ 21 a superintendent of schools for a term of not to exceed 22 three years. However, the boardâs initial contract with a 23 superintendent shall not exceed one year if the board is 24 obligated to pay a former superintendent under an unexpired 25 contract. The superintendent shall be the executive officer of 26 the board and have such powers and duties as may be prescribed 27 by rules adopted by the board or by law. Boards of directors 28 may jointly exercise the powers conferred by this section . 29 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 279.87 Audit of school district 30 spending. 31 If a resident of a school district or an employee of a 32 school district believes that the school district is improperly 33 spending school district moneys, the resident or employee may 34 report the improper spending to the county auditor of the 35 -1- LSB 2114XS (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 186 county in which the school districtâs central administrative 1 office is located and request that the county auditor audit the 2 school districtâs financial condition and transactions. 3